test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-viirrad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config::
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/g:enerator-dict-g:t-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-g:t-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/g:enerator-dict-g:t-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-g:t-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - viirrâđ: # MLchecked

    viirrâđ+V+Inf: viirrâđ
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viirâm
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viirah
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: virá
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: virreen
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: virâvettee
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viirrâv
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viirrâp
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: virâvetteđ
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vireh
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viirrim
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viirrih
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viirâi
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viiráim
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viiráid 
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viiráin
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viirâim
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viirâid
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: virrii

    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viirâ

    viirrâđ+V+PrfPrc: viirrâm
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viireem
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viireeh
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viirâš
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: virâžeen
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viirâšvettee
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: virâžává
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: virâžep
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viirâšvetteđ
    viirrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: virâžeh

    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viirâ
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: viros
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: virroon
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: virree
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: virroos
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: virroop
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: viirrâđ
    viirrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: virroos


    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: virâliđ
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: virâlâm
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: virâlah
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viirrâl
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: virâleen
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viirrâlvettee
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: virâlává
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: virâlep
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viirrâlvetteđ
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: virâleh
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: virâlim
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: virâlih
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: virâlij
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: virâláim
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: virâláid
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: virâláin
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: virâlijm
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: virâlijd
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: virâlii

    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viirrâl
    viirrâđ+V+Der/l+V+PrfPrc: virâlâm
    viirrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: virruđ
    viirrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: virroo
    viirrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: virrum
